Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-966
Facility board; members; duties; powers; warrants.

In each city or village where a facility as provided in sections 17-961 to 17-966 is established, the mayor and city council of such city or the chairperson and village board of trustees of such village may provide by ordinance for the creation of a facility board which shall be composed of not less than three nor more than seven members. The members of the facility board shall (1) be residents of such city or village, (2) have charge of the facility, and (3) have the power to establish rules for the management, operation, and use of the facility, as provided by such ordinance. When a facility board has been appointed and qualified, all accounts against the facility fund shall be audited by the facility board, warrants against such fund shall be drawn by the chairperson of such board, and warrants so drawn shall be paid by the city treasurer or village treasurer out of such fund.

Laws 1945, c. 31, § 6, p. 150;

Laws 1957, c. 36, § 5, p. 202;

Laws 1965, c. 72, § 5, p. 295;

Laws 1992, LB 1240, § 19;

Laws 2003, LB 76, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 297.